Utah statutes.
53A-26a-304.   Continuing education.

(1) (a)  As a condition for renewal of certification, each certified interpreter shall, during each three-year certification cycle or other cycle defined by rule, complete a number of hours of qualified continuing professional education in accordance with standards defined by rule.

(b)  The State Board of Education shall determine the number of hours based upon recommendations from the advisory board.

(2)  If the renewal cycle is extended or shortened under Section 53A-26a-303, the continuing education hours determined for renewal under Subsection (1) shall be increased or decreased proportionately.



Enacted by Chapter 306, 1994 General Session

